Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,115
Drug product selection; violations; penalty.

(1) In addition to any other penalties provided by law, any person who violates any provision of the Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the act is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for each violation.

(2) It is unlawful for any employer or such employer's agent to coerce a pharmacist to dispense a drug product against the professional judgment of the pharmacist or as ordered by a prescribing practitioner.

Laws 1977, LB 103, § 7;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 24;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 169;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 79;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5407;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 66.